Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5543
Filing of applications; limitation.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, there shall be no project applications filed on or after June 1, 2005, without further authorization of the Legislature, except that all project applications and all project agreements pending, approved, or entered into before such date shall continue in full force and effect.

(2) There shall be no project applications for projects described in subdivision (3)(d) of section 77-5536 filed on or after October 1, 2002, without further authorization of the Legislature, except that all such project applications and all such project agreements pending, approved, or entered into before such date shall continue in full force and effect.

Laws 2001, LB 620, § 43.